Maryland, session 2026, SB0379.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
19–2505.
(a) In this section, “Program” means the Recovery Residence Grant Program.
(b) (1) There is a Recovery Residence Grant Program in the Department.
(2) The purpose of the Program is to provide grants to recovery residences
in the State in accordance with this section.
(g) For each of fiscal years 2024 through [2027] 2030, the annual budget bill shall
include an appropriation of $500,000 for the Program.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 1 –